Utah statutes.
17-16-4.   Election of officer to consolidated office.

When offices are united and consolidated:

(1)  only one person shall be elected to fill the united and consolidated offices; and

(2)  the person elected shall:

(a)  take the oath and give the bond required for each of the offices; and

(b)  discharge all the duties pertaining to each of the offices.

